Hawaii statutes.
§580-28 Physical incapacity. An action
to annul the marriage on the ground of physical incapacity of one of the
parties at the time of marriage, shall only be maintained by the injured party,
against the party whose incapacity is alleged, and shall in all cases be
brought within two years from the solemnization of the marriage. [CC 1859,
§1321; RL 1925, §2963; RL 1935, §4458; RL 1945, §12208; RL 1955, §324-8; HRS
§580-28; am L 1973, c 211, §5(m)]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next